tests/agglut_max.aff
# For testing limits on length of affix chains. Also tests several comments approaches.

SET ISO8859-1

AGGLUTINATIVE 4 3


# Prefixes
PFX A Y 1
PFX A        0       aa/B     .  # comment

PFX B Y 1
PFX B        0       bb/C     .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C        0       cc/D     .

PFX D Y 1
PFX D        0       dd/E     .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E        0       ee/E     .


# Suffixes
SFX F Y 1
SFX F        0       ff/G     .   # comment

SFX G Y 1
SFX G        0       gg/H     .

SFX H Y 1
SFX H        0       hh       .

SFX J Y 1
SFX J        0       jj/J     .
